Utah statutes.
17-18a-801.   Public prosecutor's ethical duties.

An attorney exercising public prosecutor duties under this chapter:

(1)  is a lawyer representing an organization as a client under the Rules of Professional Conduct, Rule 1.13;

(2)  represents the state as an organizational client;

(3)  is considered the representative of the state; and

(4)  is empowered to make commitments for and decisions on behalf of the state.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

